Hawaii statutes.
§271-7 Exemptions, vehicles used by
farmers. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter all motor
vehicles used by farmers exclusively for their farm operations and all motor
vehicles used by farmers who infrequently transport from the place of
production to a warehouse, regular market, place of storage, or place of
shipment, the farm products of neighboring farmers in exchange for like or
reciprocal services, for farm products, or for a cash consideration not
exceeding $1,500 per year; provided that the transportation shall constitute
the sole transportation of property for hire or compensation of the farmers are
exempted from this chapter. [L 1962, c 12, pt of §6; Supp, §106C-5.4; HRS
§271-7; am L Sp 1977 1st, c 20, §4]

Attorney General Opinions

This section does not affect §271-5(11) and safety provisions
apply to pineapple transportation. Att. Gen. Op. 62-29.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next